Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Note

Sections 371-1 to 371-18 designated as Part I by L 2006, c
290, §2.

§371-1 Definitions. When used in this
chapter:

"Appeal board" means the labor and
industrial relations [appeals] board.

"Department" means the department of
labor and industrial relations.

"Director" means the director of
labor and industrial relations.

"Employer" includes every person
having control or custody of any employment, place of employment, or of any
employee, but shall not include the United States or the State or any political
subdivision thereof. [L 1939, c 237, pt of §1; RL 1945, §4101; am L 1955, c 19,
§1(a); RL 1955, §88-1; am L 1959, c 264, §1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §38; HRS
§371-1]

Revision Note

Definitions rearranged pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next